Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
CHAPTER 11A Executive Branch Code of Ethics

11A.001.
Short title for chapter.

This chapter may be cited as the “Executive Branch Code of Ethics.”

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 287, § 1, effective July 14, 1992.

11A.005.
Statement of public policy.

It is the public policy of this Commonwealth that a public servant shall work for the benefit of the people of the Commonwealth. The principles of ethical behavior contained in this chapter recognize that public office is a public trust and that the proper operation of democratic government requires that:

A public servant be independent and impartial;

Government policy and decisions be made through the established processes of government;

A public servant not use public office to obtain private benefits; and

The public has confidence in the integrity of its government and public servants.

The principles of ethical behavior for public servants shall recognize that:

Those who hold positions of public trust, and members of their families, also have certain business and financial interests;

Those in government service are often involved in policy decisions that pose a potential conflict with some personal financial interest; and

Standards of ethical conduct for the executive branch of state government are needed to determine those conflicts of interest which are substantial and material or which, by the nature of the conflict of interest, tend to bring public servants into disrepute.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 287, § 2, effective July 14, 1992.

11A.010.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Business” means any corporation, limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership, sole proprietorship, firm, enterprise, franchise, association, organization, self-employed individual, holding company, joint stock company, receivership, trust, or any legal entity through which business is conducted, whether or not for profit;

“Commission” means the Executive Branch Ethics Commission;

“Compensation” means any money, thing of value, or economic benefit conferred on, or received by, any person in return for services rendered, or to be rendered, by himself or herself or another;

“Family” means spouse and children, as well as a person who is related to a public servant as any of the following, whether by blood or adoption: parent, brother, sister, grandparent, grandchild, father-in-law, mother-in-law, brother-in-law, sister-in-law, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, stepfather, stepmother, stepson, stepdaughter, stepbrother, stepsister, half brother, half sister;

“Gift” means a payment, loan, subscription, advance, deposit of money, services, or anything of value, unless consideration of equal or greater value is received; “gift” does not include gifts from family members, campaign contributions, the waiver of a registration fee for a presenter at a conference or training described in KRS 45A.097(5), or door prizes available to the public;

“Income” means any money or thing of value received or to be received as a claim on future services, whether in the form of a fee, salary, expense allowance, forbearance, forgiveness, interest, dividend, royalty, rent, capital gain, or any other form of compensation or any combination thereof;

“Officer” means:

All major management personnel in the executive branch of state government, including the secretary of the cabinet, the Governor’s chief executive officers, cabinet secretaries, deputy cabinet secretaries, general counsels, commissioners, deputy commissioners, executive directors, executive assistants, policy advisors, special assistants, administrative coordinators, executive advisors, staff assistants, and division directors;

Members and full-time chief administrative officers of:

The Parole Board;

Office of Claims and Appeals;

Board of Tax Appeals;

Board of Claims;

Crime Victims Compensation Board;

Kentucky Retirement Systems board of trustees;

Kentucky Teachers’ Retirement System board of trustees;

The Kentucky Public Employees Deferred Compensation Authority board of trustees;

Public Service Commission;

Worker’s Compensation Board and its administrative law judges;

The Kentucky Occupational Safety and Health Review Commission;

The Kentucky Board of Education;

The Council on Postsecondary Education;

County Employees Retirement System board of trustees;

Kentucky Public Pensions Authority; and

The Kentucky Horse Racing Commission;

Salaried members of executive branch boards and commissions; and

Any person who, through a personal service contract or any other contractual employment arrangement with an agency, performs on a full-time, nonseasonal basis a function of any major management position listed in this subsection;

“Official duty” means any responsibility imposed on a public servant by virtue of his or her position in the state service;

“Public servant” means:

The Governor;

The Lieutenant Governor;

The Secretary of State;

The Attorney General;

The Treasurer;

The Commissioner of Agriculture;

The Auditor of Public Accounts;

All employees in the executive branch including officers as defined in subsection (7) of this section and merit employees; and

Any person who, through any contractual arrangement with an agency, is employed to perform a function of a position within an executive branch agency on a full-time, nonseasonal basis;

“Agency” means every state office, cabinet, department, board, commission, public corporation, or authority in the executive branch of state government. A public servant is employed by the agency by which his or her appointing authority is employed, unless his or her agency is attached to the appointing authority’s agency for administrative purposes only, or unless the agency’s characteristics are of a separate independent nature distinct from the appointing authority and it is considered an agency on its own, such as an independent department;

“Lobbyist” means any person employed as a legislative agent as defined in KRS 6.611(23) or any person employed as an executive agency lobbyist as defined in KRS 11A.201(9);

“Lobbyist’s principal” means the entity in whose behalf the lobbyist promotes, opposes, or acts;

“Candidate” means those persons who have officially filed candidacy papers or who have been nominated by their political party pursuant to KRS

118.105

,

118.115

,

118.325

, or

118.760

for any of the offices enumerated in subsections (9)(a) to (g) of this section;

“Does business with” or “doing business with” means contracting, entering into an agreement, leasing, or otherwise exchanging services or goods with a state agency in return for payment by the state, including accepting a grant, but not including accepting a state entitlement fund disbursement;

“Public agency” means any governmental entity;

“Appointing authority” means the agency head or any person whom he or she has authorized by law to act on behalf of the agency with respect to employee appointments;

“Represent” means to attend an agency proceeding, write a letter, or communicate with an employee of an agency on behalf of someone else;

“Directly involved” means to work on personally or to supervise someone who works on personally;

“Sporting event” means any professional or amateur sport, athletic game, contest, event, or race involving machines, persons, or animals, for which admission tickets are offered for sale and that is viewed by the public;

“Person” means an individual, proprietorship, firm, partnership, limited partnership, joint venture, joint stock company, syndicate, business or statutory trust, donative trust, estate, company, corporation, limited liability company, association, club, committee, organization, or group of persons acting in concert; and

“Salaried” means receiving a fixed compensation or benefit reserved for full-time employees, which is paid on a regular basis without regard to the actual number of hours worked.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 287, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 71, effective September 16, 1993; 1994, ch. 406, § 7, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 362, § 6, effective July 15, 1996; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 149, effective May 30, 1997; 1998, ch. 429, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 431, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 602, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 417, § 3, effective December 1, 2000; 2000, ch. 475, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 542, § 5, effective July 14, 2000; 2003, ch. 29, § 3, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 123, § 7, effective June 20, 2005; 2012, ch. 75, § 1, effective April 11, 2012; 2012, ch. 81, § 77, effective July 12, 2012; 2013, ch. 106, § 1, effective June 25, 2013; 2014, ch. 75, § 11, effective July 15, 2014; 2018 ch. 107, § 83, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 195, § 1, effective June 27, 2019; 2020 ch. 127, § 7, effective July 15, 2020; 2020 ch. 79, § 11, effective April 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 185, § 4, effective June 29, 2021; 2021 ch. 200, § 5, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2021). This statute was amended by 2021 Ky. Acts chs. 185 and 200, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

(12/13/2018). On December 13, 2018, the Kentucky Supreme Court ruled that the passage of 2018 SB 151 (2018 Ky. Acts ch. 107), did not comply with the three-readings rule of Kentucky Constitution Section 46 and that the legislation is, therefore, constitutionally invalid and declared void. That ruling applies to changes made to this statute in that Act.

(6/20/2005).
2005 Ky. Acts chs. 11,
85,
95,
97,
98,
99,
123, and
181 instruct the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in the 2005 legislation confirming the reorganization of the executive branch. Such a correction has been made in this section.

(12/1/2000). The contingency on the effectiveness of this statute set by
2000 Ky. Acts ch. 417, sec. 18, was met, the voters of the Commonwealth having ratified at the general election on November 7, 2000, a constitutional amendment (see
2000 Ky. Acts ch. 399) abolishing the Railroad Commission.

11A.015.
Agency exempt from chapter if law or administrative regulation creates its code of ethics.

An agency that is directed by statute to adopt a code of ethics shall be exempt from KRS Chapter 11A upon the effective date of an Act of the General Assembly creating the agency’s code of ethics or upon the effective date of an administrative regulation that creates the agency’s code of ethics.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 475, § 5, effective July 14, 2000.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Commonwealth’s Attorneys are not covered by the provisions of KRS 11A. Rather, KRS 15 contains specific statutory directives regarding ethical consideration related to prosecutorial practice that governs Commonwealth’s Attorneys.

OAG 2005-09

.

11A.020.
Public servant prohibited from certain conduct — Exception — Disclosure of personal or private interest.

No public servant, by himself or through others, shall knowingly:

Use or attempt to use his influence in any matter which involves a substantial conflict between his personal or private interest and his duties in the public interest;

Use or attempt to use any means to influence a public agency in derogation of the state at large;

Use his official position or office to obtain financial gain for himself or any members of the public servant’s family; or

Use or attempt to use his official position to secure or create privileges, exemptions, advantages, or treatment for himself or others in derogation of the public interest at large.

If a public servant appears before a state agency, he shall avoid all conduct which might in any way lead members of the general public to conclude that he is using his official position to further his professional or private interest.

When a public servant abstains from action on an official decision in which he has or may have a personal or private interest, he shall disclose that fact in writing to his superior, who shall cause the decision on these matters to be made by an impartial third party.

The prohibitions imposed by subsection (1)(c) of this section shall not apply to Professional Golfers’ Association class A members who teach golf lessons and receive a fee or lesson charge at golf courses owned and operated by the Kentucky Department of Parks. Instruction provided by an employee of the Commonwealth shall only be given while the employee is on his or her own personal time. The commissioner of the Department of Parks shall promulgate administrative regulations to establish guidelines for the process by which Professional Golfers’ Association class A members are approved to teach golf lessons at Kentucky Department of Parks-owned golf courses. The exception granted by this subsection is in recognition of the benefits that will accrue to the Kentucky Department of Parks due to increased participation at state-owned golf courses.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 287, § 4, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 381, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

11A.030.
Considerations in determination to abstain from action on official decision — Advisory opinion.

In determining whether to abstain from action on an official decision because of a possible conflict of interest, a public servant should consider the following guidelines:

Whether a substantial threat to his independence of judgment has been created by his personal or private interest;

The effect of his participation on public confidence in the integrity of the executive branch;

Whether his participation is likely to have any significant effect on the disposition of the matter;

The need for his particular contribution, such as special knowledge of the subject matter, to the effective functioning of the executive branch; or

Whether the official decision will affect him in a manner differently from the public or will affect him as a member of a business, profession, occupation, or group to no greater extent generally than other members of such business, profession, occupation, or group. A public servant may request an advisory opinion from the Executive Branch Ethics Commission in accordance with the commission’s rules of procedure.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 287, § 5, effective July 14, 1992.

11A.040.
Acts prohibited for public servant or officer — Exceptions.

A public servant, in order to further his or her own economic interests, or those of any other person, shall not knowingly disclose or use confidential information acquired in the course of his or her official duties.

A public servant shall not knowingly receive, directly or indirectly, any interest or profit arising from the use or loan of public funds in his or her hands or to be raised through any state agency.

A public servant shall not knowingly act as a representative or agent for the Commonwealth or any agency in the transaction of any business or regulatory action with himself or herself, or with any business in which he or she or a member of his or her family has any interest greater than five percent (5%) of the total value thereof.

A public servant shall not knowingly himself or herself or through any business in which he or she owns or controls an interest of more than five percent (5%), or by any other person for his or her use or benefit or on his or her account, undertake, execute, hold, bid on, negotiate, or enjoy, in whole or in part, any contract, agreement, lease, sale, or purchase made, entered into, awarded, or granted by the agency by which he or she is employed or which he or she supervises, subject to the provisions of KRS

45A.340

. This provision shall not apply to:

A contract, purchase, or good faith negotiation made pursuant to KRS Chapter 416 relating to eminent domain; or

Agreements which may directly or indirectly involve public funds disbursed through entitlement programs; or

A public servant’s spouse or child doing business with any state agency other than the agency by which the public servant is employed or which he supervises; or

Purchases from a state agency that are available on the same terms to the general public or that are made at public auction; or

Sales of craft items to a state park by interim state employees designated as craftspersons under KRS

148.257

.

A public servant shall not knowingly accept compensation, other than that provided by law for public servants, for performance of his or her official duties without the prior approval of the commission.

A former officer or public servant listed in KRS 11A.010(9)(a) to (g) shall not, within one (1) year of termination of his or her employment, knowingly by himself or herself or through any business in which he or she owns or controls an interest of at least five percent (5%), or by any other person for his or her use or benefit or on his or her account, undertake, execute, hold, bid on, negotiate, or enjoy, in whole or in part, any contract, agreement, lease, sale, or purchase made, entered into, awarded, or granted by the agency by which he or she was employed. This provision shall not apply to a contract, purchase, or good-faith negotiation made under KRS Chapter 416 relating to eminent domain or to agreements that may directly or indirectly involve public funds disbursed through entitlement programs. This provision shall not apply to purchases from a state agency that are available on the same terms to the general public or that are made at public auction. This provision shall not apply to former officers of the Department of Public Advocacy whose continued representation of clients is necessary in order to prevent an adverse effect on the client.

A present or former officer or public servant listed in KRS 11A.010(9)(a) to (g) shall not, within one (1) year following termination of his or her office or employment, accept employment, compensation, or other economic benefit from any person or business that contracts or does business with, or is regulated by, the state in matters in which he or she was directly involved during the last thirty-six (36) months of his or her tenure. This provision shall not prohibit an individual from returning to the same business, firm, occupation, or profession in which he or she was involved prior to taking office or beginning his or her term of employment, or for which he or she received, prior to his or her state employment, a professional degree or license, provided that, for a period of one (1) year, he or she personally refrains from working on any matter in which he or she was directly involved during the last thirty-six (36) months of his or her tenure in state government. This subsection shall not prohibit the performance of ministerial functions, including but not limited to filing tax returns, filing applications for permits or licenses, or filing incorporation papers, nor shall it prohibit the former officer or public servant from receiving public funds disbursed through entitlement programs.

A former public servant shall not act as a lobbyist or lobbyist’s principal in matters in which he or she was directly involved during the last thirty-six (36) months of his or her tenure for a period of one (1) year after the latter of:

The date of leaving office or termination of employment; or

The date the term of office expires to which the public servant was elected.

A former public servant shall not represent a person or business before a state agency in a matter in which the former public servant was directly involved during the last thirty-six (36) months of his or her tenure, for a period of one (1) year after the latter of:

The date of leaving office or termination of employment; or

The date the term of office expires to which the public servant was elected.

Without the approval of his appointing authority, a public servant shall not accept outside employment from any person or business that does business with or is regulated by the state agency for which the public servant works or which he or she supervises, unless the outside employer’s relationship with the state agency is limited to the receipt of entitlement funds.

The appointing authority shall review administrative regulations established under KRS Chapter 11A when deciding whether to approve outside employment for a public servant.

The appointing authority shall not approve outside employment for a public servant if the public servant is involved in decision-making or recommendations concerning the person or business from which the public servant seeks outside employment or compensation.

The appointing authority, if applicable, shall file quarterly with the Executive Branch Ethics Commission a list of all employees who have been approved for outside employment along with the name of the outside employer of each.

The prohibitions imposed by subsection (5) or (10) of this section shall not apply to Professional Golfers’ Association class A members who teach golf lessons and receive a fee or lesson charge at golf courses owned and operated by the Kentucky Department of Parks. Instruction provided by an employee of the Commonwealth shall only be given while the employee is on his or her own personal time. The commissioner of the Department of Parks shall promulgate administrative regulations to establish guidelines for the process by which Professional Golfers’ Association class A members are approved to teach golf lessons at Kentucky Department of Parks-owned golf courses. The exception granted by this subsection is in recognition of the benefits that will accrue to the Kentucky Department of Parks due to increased participation at state-owned golf courses.

The prohibitions imposed by subsections (6) to (10) of this section shall not apply to members of the Kentucky Horse Racing Commission.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 287, § 6, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 434, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 367, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 381, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 429, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 430, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 602, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 417, § 4, effective December 1, 2000; 2000, ch. 475, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2006, ch. 68, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2019 ch. 74, § 1, effective June 27, 2019; 2021 ch. 200, § 6, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(12/1/2000). The contingency on the effectiveness of this statute set by
2000 Ky. Acts ch. 417, sec. 18, was met, the voters of the Commonwealth having ratified at the general election on November 7, 2000, a constitutional amendment (see
2000 Ky. Acts ch. 399) abolishing the Railroad Commission.

(7/15/98). A reference to “KRS 11A.010(9)(a) to (i)” in the former subsection (6) of this statute (now subsection (7)) has been changed in codification to “KRS 11A.010(9)(a) to (h)” under KRS 7.136(1)(e) and (h). 1998 Ky. Acts ch. 429, sec. 1, eliminated the former paragraph (g) of KRS 11A.010(9) and renumbered the remaining subsections accordingly. Other actions within Acts Chapter 429 used the “(a) to (h)” range in new language and modified existing language to use the “(a) to (h)” range. It seems clear from context, and this has been confirmed by the drafter of the bill, that this change was intended here as well but was inadvertently overlooked.

11A.045.
Acceptance of gifts by public servants permitted under certain circumstances.

No public servant, his spouse, or dependent child knowingly shall accept any gifts or gratuities, including travel expenses, meals, alcoholic beverages, and honoraria, totaling a value greater than twenty-five dollars ($25) in a single calendar year from any person or business that does business with, is regulated by, is seeking grants from, is involved in litigation against, or is lobbying or attempting to influence the actions of the agency in which the public servant is employed or which he supervises, or from any group or association which has as its primary purpose the representation of those persons or businesses. Nothing contained in this subsection shall prohibit the commission from authorizing exceptions to this subsection where such exemption would not create an appearance of impropriety. This subsection shall not apply to:

Activities involving sponsorships, naming rights, or similar honoraria granted under KRS

45A.097

; or

Individuals traveling on their own while involved in activities related to KRS

45A.097

.

Nothing in KRS Chapter 11A shall prohibit or restrict the allocation of or acceptance by a public servant of a ticket for admission to a sporting event if the ticket or admission is paid for by the public servant at face value or is paid for at face value by the individual to whom the ticket is allocated.

Nothing in KRS

11A.001

to

11A.110

shall prohibit or restrict the acceptance by a public servant of the Cabinet for Economic Development or by any other public servant working directly with the cabinet on an economic incentive package of anything of economic value as a gift or gratuity, if the gift or gratuity:

Was not solicited by the public servant;

Was accepted by the public servant in the performance of his or her official duties and in compliance with guidelines to be established by the Kentucky Economic Development Partnership which shall include requirements that all gifts or gratuities of a reportable value under KRS 11A.050(3)(k) be registered with the Kentucky Economic Development Partnership and with the Executive Branch Ethics Commission and that all tangible property with a value in excess of twenty-five dollars ($25), other than food and beverages consumed on the premises, shall be turned over to the Cabinet for Economic Development within thirty (30) days of receipt. In filing reports of gifts or gratuities with the Executive Branch Ethics Commission, the Cabinet for Economic Development may delete information identifying the donors if the cabinet believes identification of the donors would damage economic development; and

Was not accepted under circumstances which would create a violation of KRS Chapter 521.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 450, § 36, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 431, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 475, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 542, § 6, effective July 14, 2000; 2017 ch. 175, § 4, effective June 29, 2017.

11A.047.
Definitions — Transition team to promote orderly transfer of executive power and continuity in conduct of state government — Executive Branch Ethics Commission to establish in administrative regulations standards of ethical conduct for transition team members — Access to and confidentiality of nonpublic information — Disclosure of positions held outside state government — Financial conflicts of interest — Standards of ethical conduct to be available on commission’s Web site.

As used in this section:

“Agency” means any department, program cabinet, division, institution, board, commission, office, or agency of state government;

“Nonpublic information” means information relating to state government that a transition team member obtains as part of his or her participation on the transition team that such member knows or reasonably should know has not been made available to the general public, or is otherwise not available for public inspection under KRS

61.870

to

61.884

;

“Transition team” means a team created by a person newly elected to any office listed in KRS 11A.010(9)(a) to (g) to promote the orderly transfer of executive power and ensure continuity in the conduct of the affairs of state government in connection with the expiration of the term of office for any person elected to the offices listed under KRS 11A.010(9)(a) to (g) and the election and inauguration of another person to serve in any of the offices listed in KRS 11A.010(9)(a) to (g); and

“Transition team member” means any person designated to serve on a transition team.

A person newly elected to any office listed in KRS 11A.010(9)(a) to (g) may create a transition team for the purpose of promoting an orderly transfer of executive power and ensuring continuity in the conduct of affairs of state government by requesting and utilizing information provided by the administration of the outgoing official that had been elected to any office listed in KRS 11A.010(9)(a) to (g) prior to the expiration of his or her term of office.

The commission shall establish by administrative regulation promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A standards of ethical conduct for transition team members. The standards of ethical conduct for transition team members shall include ethics requirements that:

Apply to all transition team members;

Address the role of transition team members who are:

Registered lobbyists under KRS

6.801

to

6.829

and KRS

11A.201

to

11A.246

; or

Former lobbyists who were registered under KRS

6.801

to

6.829

and KRS

11A.201

to

11A.246

during the twelve (12) month period prior to becoming a transition team member.

Each person elected to an office listed in KRS 11A.010(9)(a) to (g) shall designate a person or persons to lead his or her transition team or transition teams. Persons designated as transition team leaders shall, on a form prescribed by the commission by administrative regulation promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A, submit to the commission:

A list of all transition team members;

A description of how transition team members will comply with the provisions contained within this section; and

Any additions to or departures from the list of transition team members as necessary to provide an accurate and up-to-date list.

A transition team member shall:

Seek authorization from the transition team leader designated by the person elected to the office listed in KRS 11A.010(9)(a) to (g) to oversee the transition team to which the transition team member is assigned before seeking access to any nonpublic information as part of the transition process;

Keep confidential any nonpublic information provided in the course of the duties of the transition team member with the transition team and exclusively use such information for the purposes of the transition; and

Not use any nonpublic information provided in the course of transition duties, in any manner, for personal or private gain of the transition team member or any other party at any time during or after the transition.

A transition team member shall not receive nonpublic information regarding matters that financially impact:

The transition team member or his or her spouse;

The transition team member’s employer or his or her spouse’s employer;

The transition team member’s lobbying clients;

Any business in which the transition team member or his or her spouse is a board member;

Any business in which the transition team member or his or her spouse is an officer;

Any business in which the transition team member or his or her spouse is an owner of five percent (5%) or more of the business; or

Any provider of non-state sources of funds received by the transition team member related to his or her transition team duties.

Every transition team member shall disclose prior to serving on the transition team, and update as necessary during service on the transition team on a form prescribed by the commission by administrative regulation promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A:

His or her current employer and the current employer of his or her spouse;

Any business in which a transition team member or his or her spouse is a board member, an officer, or an owner of five percent (5%) or more of the business during the twelve (12) month period prior to becoming a transition team member;

Any non-state sources of funds received for his or her services related to transition team duties;

All positions the transition team member has held outside of state government for the twelve (12) month period prior to becoming a transition team member, including both paid and unpaid positions;

Any contracts that the transition team member or his or her spouse has sought or received with state government during the twelve (12) month period prior to becoming a transition team member and affirmation that the transition team member and his or her spouse will not seek a contract with a state agency for which he or she received nonpublic information during the tenure of the administration;

Whether the transition team member or his or her spouse has accepted any gift or payment exceeding twenty-five dollars ($25) or has accepted future employment from any party interested in seeking influence in state government during the twelve (12) month period prior to becoming a transition team member, or during service as a transition team member;

A description of the transition team member’s role in the transition, including a list of any policy issues on which the transition team member is expected to work, and a list of agencies with which the transition team member is expected to interact while serving on the transition team;

Any issues from which each transition team member shall be recused while serving as a member of the transition team; and

An affirmation that each transition team member does not have a financial conflict of interest that precludes transition team members from working on specified issues to which he or she has been assigned.

The commission shall make the standards of ethical conduct for transition team members available to the public on its Web site.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 129, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

11A.050.
Financial disclosure by officers, candidates, and public servants.

Each officer, each public servant listed in KRS 11A.010(9)(a) to (g), and each candidate shall file a statement of financial disclosure with the commission, as follows:

Each officer shall file the statement within thirty (30) days of employment as an officer, and each officer who occupies his or her position during any portion of a calendar year shall file the statement for that portion of the calendar year he or she occupied the position on or before April 15 of the following year, whether or not he or she remains an officer;

Each public servant listed in KRS 11A.010(9)(a) to (g) who occupies his or her position during any portion of a calendar year shall file the statement for that portion of the calendar year he or she occupied the position on or before April 15 of the following year, whether or not he or she remains a public servant as listed in KRS 11A.010(9)(a) to (g);

Each officer and public servant listed in KRS 11A.010(9)(a) to (g) who does not remain an officer or public servant listed in KRS 11A.010(9)(a) to (g) for the entire calendar year shall file the statement for the portion of the calendar year that the person served as an officer or public servant listed in KRS 11A.010(9)(a) to (g). The statement shall be filed with the commission within thirty (30) days after the date the person no longer serves as an officer or public servant listed in KRS 11A.010(9)(a) to (g);

A candidate shall file the statement reflecting the previous calendar year with the commission no later than February 15; and

Each candidate elected to serve as a public servant in a position listed in KRS 11A.010(9)(a) to (g) shall, within ten (10) days of taking the oath of office for the position to which he or she was elected, file a statement of financial disclosure with the commission for the calendar year in which the election was held.

The statement of financial disclosure shall be filed on a form prescribed by the commission. The commission shall provide copies of the form upon request without charge.

The statement shall include the following information for the preceding calendar year:

Name and entire residential and business address of filer;

Title of position or office whereby filing is required;

Any other occupations of filer and spouse;

Positions held by the filer or his or her spouse in any business, and the name and address of the business;

Name and address of any employer by whom the filer was employed for the one (1) year period immediately prior to becoming an officer, not including those listed in paragraph (d) of this subsection;

Names and addresses of all businesses in which the filer, his or her spouse, or dependent children has or had an interest of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) at fair market value or five percent (5%) ownership interest or more;

The name and address of any source of gross income exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) from any one (1) source to the filer, his or her spouse, or dependent child, as well as information concerning the nature of the business, and the form of the income;

Any representation or intervention for compensation by the filer or his or her spouse for any person or business before a state agency for which the filer works or supervises or before any entity of state government for which the filer would serve in a decision-making capacity, including the name and address of the person or business;

All positions of a fiduciary nature held by the filer or his or her spouse in a business, including the name and address of the business;

Information, including a street address or location, regarding any real property in which there is an interest of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more held by the filer, his or her spouse, or dependent children;

Sources, including each source’s name and address, of gifts of money or property with a retail value of more than two hundred dollars ($200) from any one (1) source to the filer, his or her spouse, or dependent children, except those from a member of the filer’s family;

Identity, including an address, of creditors owed more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), except debts arising from the purchase of consumer goods; and

Names and addresses of family members of the filer or persons with whom the filer was engaged in a business who are registered as legislative agents under KRS

6.807

or executive agency lobbyists under KRS

11A.211

.

Paragraphs (a) to (m) of this subsection shall not require disclosure of specific dollar amounts or of privileged information.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 287, § 7, effective July 14, 1992; 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 72, effective September 16, 1993; 1998, ch. 429, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 417, § 5, effective December 1, 2000; 2000, ch. 475, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; 2019 ch. 74, § 2, effective June 27, 2019; 2021 ch. 129, § 2, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(12/1/2000). The contingency on the effectiveness of this statute set by
2000 Ky. Acts ch. 417, sec. 18, was met, the voters of the Commonwealth having ratified at the general election on November 7, 2000, a constitutional amendment (see
2000 Ky. Acts ch. 399) abolishing the Railroad Commission.

(7/15/98). A reference to “KRS 11A.010(9)(a) to (i)” in subsection (1) of this statute has been changed in codification to “KRS 11A.010(9)(a) to (h)” under KRS 7.136(1)(e) and (h). 1998 Ky. Acts ch. 429, sec. 1, eliminated the former paragraph (g) of KRS 11A.010(9) and renumbered the remaining subsections accordingly. Other actions within Acts Chapter 429, including in the section that amended this statute, used the “(a) to (h)” range in new language and modified existing language to use the “(a) to (h)” range. It seems clear from context, and this has been confirmed by the drafter of the bill, that this change was intended here as well but was inadvertently overlooked.